Illinois, session 104th, HB5219.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Safe Voting 5Act.  6    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 717-29.5 as follows: 8    (10 ILCS 5/17-29.5 new)9    Sec. 17-29.5. Election safe zones.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Arrest" means the taking of an individual into custody by 12a law enforcement agency or by a law enforcement officer.13    "Civil arrest" means an arrest that is not:14        (1) a criminal arrest for an alleged violation of any 15    federal, State, or local criminal law;16        (2) an arrest for any violation of any condition of 17    probation, parole, pretrial release, supervised release, 18    or mandatory supervised release for which arrest is 19    otherwise authorized by law; or20        (3) an arrest supported by a judicial warrant or 21    judicial order authorizing the arrest.22    For the purpose of this definition, a judicial warrant or   HB5219- 2 -LRB104 20233 SPS 33684 b1judicial order authorizing the arrest is a written order from 2a State court or federal Article III court that directs a law 3enforcement agency, or a specifically named person, to arrest 4a person.5    "Law enforcement agency" means any entity with statutory 6police powers and the authority to employ individuals 7authorized to make arrests.8    (b) A person who, in good faith, attends a polling place, 9ballot drop box, or election authority for the purpose of 10casting a vote, including early voting, or submitting a vote 11by mail ballot, and is legally qualified under the laws of this 12State to cast the vote or submit the ballot, is privileged from 13civil arrest while going to, remaining at, and returning from 14the polling place, ballot drop box, or election authority, 15including:16        (1) at the polling place, ballot drop box, or election 17    authority;18        (2) within the polling place or election authority;19        (3) on the premises of the polling place, ballot drop 20    box, or election authority, including parking facilities 21    serving the polling place, ballot drop box, or election 22    authority;23        (4) on any sidewalk, parkway, or street surrounding 24    the polling place, ballot drop box, or election authority; 25    and26        (5) on any public way within 200 horizontal feet of   HB5219- 3 -LRB104 20233 SPS 33684 b1    the polling place, ballot drop box, or election authority, 2    including any sidewalk, parkway, or street.3    (c) To maintain access to the polling place, ballot drop 4box, or election authority and to prevent interference with 5the right of every eligible and qualified voter to exercise 6the right to cast a ballot, a county board, election 7authority, or the State Board of Elections may adopt or issue 8appropriate rules, resolutions, ordinances, or guidance to 9protect the privilege from arrest provided under this Section.10    (d) A person who violates this Section is liable for civil 11damages for false imprisonment, including actual damages and 12statutory damages of no more than $10,000, if the person knew 13or reasonably should have known that the person arrested is a 14person duly and in good faith attending a polling place, 15ballot drop box, or election authority to exercise the right 16to vote while going to, remaining at, and returning from the 17polling place, ballot drop box, or election authority. A court 18may grant any other equitable or declaratory relief it deems 19appropriate. In a successful action under this Section, a 20plaintiff may recover court costs and reasonable attorney's 21fees.22    (e) No action or proceeding may be commenced under this 23Section against the county board, election authority, or State 24Board of Elections, or any personnel thereof, acting lawfully 25under their duty to maintain safety and order in and around the 26polling place, ballot drop box, or election authority.  HB5219- 4 -LRB104 20233 SPS 33684 b1    (f) Nothing in this Section affects any right or defense, 2including any existing qualified immunity defense, of any 3person, police officer, peace officer or public officer, or 4any election officials of this State under State or federal 5law.6    (g) Nothing in this Section precludes the execution of a 7criminal arrest warrant issued by a judge or a criminal arrest 8based on probable cause for a violation of criminal law.